Hawaii, session 2026, SB993.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 196, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part I to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§196-    Geothermal resources characterization program.  (a) The Hawaii state energy office shall: (1)  Conduct a statewide environmental assessment for a geothermal resources characterization program under the direction of the Hawaii groundwater and geothermal resources center at the university of Hawaii that identifies the location and characteristics of underground geothermal resources across the State; (2)  Establish a timeline for completion of the environmental assessment that includes clear metrics for success and defined criteria for evaluating geothermal resource viability, including maps, resource data, or the number of identified geothermal sites; (3)  Incorporate traditional ecological knowledge into the environmental assessment process pursuant to paragraph (1); (4)  In accordance with the statewide environmental assessment, administer the geothermal resources characterization program under the direction of the Hawaii groundwater and geothermal resources center at the university of Hawaii; (5)  Outline how the geothermal resources characterization program's data will be used for further exploration, resource development, or public dissemination; and (6)  Recommend protocols for transitioning the geothermal resources characterization program from exploration to development, including permitting and regulatory processes recommendations. (b)  Before and during the environmental assessment and geothermal resources characterization program, the Hawaii state energy office, supported by the Hawaii groundwater and geothermal resources center, shall engage with the counties and nearby communities, including individuals, civic organizations, Native Hawaiian organizations, cultural practitioners, and local community leaders, to understand community needs, priorities, and concerns with regard to the program and shall incorporate stakeholder input to address concerns related to land use and cultural impact." SECTION 2.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $6,000,000 or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the Hawaii state energy office to conduct the statewide environmental assessment and administer the geothermal resources characterization program consistent with the requirements of this Act. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the Hawaii state energy office for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________